Ohio, session 136, HB827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 5104.34 and 5104.38 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 5104.34. (A)(1) Each county department of job and family services shall implement procedures for making determinations of eligibility for publicly funded child care. Under those procedures, the eligibility determination for each applicant shall be made no later than thirty calendar days from the date the county department receives a completed application for publicly funded child care. Each applicant shall be notified promptly of the results of the eligibility determination. An applicant aggrieved by a decision or delay in making an eligibility determination may appeal the decision or delay to the department of children and youth in accordance with section 5101.35 of the Revised Code. The due process rights of applicants shall be protected. To the extent permitted by federal law, the county department may make all determinations of eligibility for publicly funded child care, may contract with child care providers or child care resource and referral service organizations for the providers or resource and referral service organizations to make all or any part of the determinations, and may contract with child care providers or child care resource and referral service organizations for the providers or resource and referral service organizations to collect specified information for use by the county department in making determinations. If a county department contracts with a child care provider or a child care resource and referral service organization for eligibility determinations or for the collection of information, the contract shall require the provider or resource and referral service organization to make each eligibility determination no later than thirty calendar days from the date the provider or resource and referral organization receives a completed application that is the basis of the determination and to collect and transmit all necessary information to the county department within a period of time that enables the county department to make each eligibility determination no later than thirty days after the filing of the application that is the basis of the determination. The county department may station employees of the department in various locations throughout the county to collect information relevant to applications for publicly funded child care and to make eligibility determinations. The county department, child care provider, and child care resource and referral service organization shall make each determination of eligibility for publicly funded child care no later than thirty days after the filing of the application that is the basis of the determination, shall make each determination in accordance with any relevant rules adopted pursuant to section 5104.38 of the Revised Code, and shall notify promptly each applicant for publicly funded child care of the results of the determination of the applicant's eligibility. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for monitoring the eligibility determination process. In accordance with those rules, the state department shall monitor eligibility determinations made by county departments of job and family services and shall direct any entity that is not in compliance with this division or any rule adopted under this division to implement corrective action specified by the department. (2)(a) All eligibility determinations for publicly funded child care shall be made in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (A) of section 5104.38 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all of the following apply: (i) Publicly funded child care may be provided only to eligible infants, toddlers, preschool-age children, school-age children under age thirteen, or children receiving special needs child care. (ii) For an applicant to be eligible for publicly funded child care, the caretaker parent must be employed or participating in a program of education or training for an amount of time reasonably related to the time that the parent's children are receiving publicly funded child care. This restriction does not apply to families whose children are eligible for protective child care. (iii) The eligibility period for publicly funded child care shall be at least twelve months. (b) If a caretaker parent who has been determined eligible to receive publicly funded child care no longer meets the requirements of division (A)(2)(a)(ii) of this section, the caretaker parent may continue to receive publicly funded child care for a period of at least three but not more than four months not to extend beyond the caretaker parent's eligibility period. (c) If a child turns thirteen, or if a child receiving special needs child care turns eighteen, during the eligibility period, the caretaker parent may continue to receive publicly funded child care until the end of that eligibility period. Subject to available funds, the department of children and youth shall allow a family to receive publicly funded child care unless the family's income exceeds the maximum income eligibility limit. Initial and continued eligibility for publicly funded child care is subject to available funds unless the family is receiving child care pursuant to division (A)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 5104.30 of the Revised Code. If the department must limit eligibility due to lack of available funds, it shall give first priority for publicly funded child care to an assistance group whose income is not more than the maximum income eligibility limit that received transitional child care in the previous month but is no longer eligible because the eligibility period has expired. Such an assistance group shall continue to receive priority for publicly funded child care until its income exceeds the maximum income eligibility limit. (3) An assistance group that ceases to participate in the Ohio works first program established under Chapter 5107. of the Revised Code is eligible for transitional child care at any time during the immediately following twelve-month period that both of the following apply: (a) The assistance group requires child care due to employment; (b) The assistance group's income is not more than one two hundred fifty five per cent of the federal poverty line. An assistance group ineligible to participate in the Ohio works first program pursuant to section 5101.83 or section 5107.16 of the Revised Code is not eligible for transitional child care. (B) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department of children and youth may require a caretaker parent determined to be eligible for publicly funded child care to pay a fee according to the schedule of fees established in rules adopted under section 5104.38 of the Revised Code. The department shall make protective child care services and homeless child care services available to children without regard to the income or assets of the caretaker parent of the child. (C) A caretaker parent receiving publicly funded child care shall report to the entity that determined eligibility any changes in status with respect to employment or participation in a program of education or training not later than ten calendar days after the change occurs. (D) If the department of children and youth determines that available resources are not sufficient to provide publicly funded child care to all eligible families who request it, the department may establish a waiting list. The department may establish separate waiting lists within the waiting list based on income. (E) A caretaker parent shall not receive publicly funded child care from more than one child care provider per child during a week, unless a county department grants the family an exemption for one of the following reasons: (1) The child needs additional care during non-traditional hours; (2) The child needs to change providers in the middle of the week and the hours of care provided by the providers do not overlap; (3) The child's provider is closed on scheduled school days off or on calamity days. (F) As used in this section, "maximum income eligibility limit" means the amount of income specified in rules adopted under division (A) of section 5104.38 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5104.38. In addition to any other rules adopted under this chapter, the director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing financial and administrative requirements for publicly funded child care and establishing all of the following: (A) Procedures and criteria to be used in making determinations of eligibility for publicly funded child care that give priority to children of families with lower incomes and procedures and criteria for eligibility for publicly funded protective child care or homeless child care. The rules shall specify the maximum amount of income a family may have for initial and continued eligibility. The Beginning July 1, 2027, the maximum amount shall not exceed three the following: (1) For initial eligibility, two hundred per cent of the federal poverty line; (2) For initial eligibility for special needs child care, two hundred five per cent of the federal poverty line; (3) For continued eligibility, three hundred fifty-five per cent of the federal poverty line. The The rules may specify exceptions to the eligibility requirements in the case of a family that previously received publicly funded child care and is seeking to have the child care reinstated after the family's eligibility was terminated. (B) A schedule of fees requiring all eligible caretaker parents to pay a fee for publicly funded child care according to income and family size, which shall be uniform for all types of publicly funded child care, except as authorized by rule, and, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall permit the use of state and federal funds to pay the customary deposits and other advance payments that a provider charges all children who receive child care from that provider. (C) A formula for determining the amount of state and federal funds appropriated for publicly funded child care that may be allocated to a county department to use for administrative purposes; (D) Procedures to be followed by the department and county departments in recruiting individuals and groups to become providers of child care; (E) Procedures to be followed in establishing state or local programs designed to assist individuals who are eligible for publicly funded child care in identifying the resources available to them and to refer the individuals to appropriate sources to obtain child care; (F) Procedures to deal with fraud and abuse committed by either recipients or providers of publicly funded child care; (G) Procedures for establishing a child care grant or loan program in accordance with the child care block grant act; (H) Standards and procedures for applicants to apply for grants and loans, and for the department to make grants and loans; (I) A definition of "person who stands in loco parentis" for the purposes of division (OO)(3) of section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; (J) Procedures for a county department of job and family services to follow in making eligibility determinations and redeterminations for publicly funded child care available through telephone, computer, and other means at locations other than the county department; (K) If the director establishes a different payment rate under division (E)(3)(d) of section 5104.30 of the Revised Code, standards and procedures for determining the amount of the higher payment that is to be issued to a child care provider based on the special needs of the child being served; (L) To the extent permitted by federal law, procedures for enrolling and paying for up to thirty days of child care for a child whose caretaker parent is seeking employment, taking part in employment orientation activities, or taking part in activities in anticipation of enrolling in or attending an education or training program or activity, if the employment or the education or training program or activity is expected to begin within the thirty-day period; (M) Any other rules necessary to carry out sections 5104.30 to 5104.43 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 5104.34 and 5104.38 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.